Washington statutes.
RCW 18.86.080

Compensation.

(1) In any real estate transaction, a firm's compensation may be paid by the seller, the buyer, a third party, or by sharing the compensation between firms.

(2) An agreement to pay or payment of compensation does not establish an agency relationship between the party who paid the compensation and the broker.

(3) A seller may agree that a seller's agent's firm may share with another firm the compensation paid by the seller.

(4) A buyer may agree that a buyer's agent's firm may share with another firm the compensation paid by the buyer.

(5) A firm may be compensated by more than one party for real estate brokerage services in a real estate transaction.

(6) A firm may receive compensation based on the purchase price without breaching any duty to the buyer or seller.

(7) To receive compensation for rendering real estate brokerage services from any party or firm, a real estate firm must have a services agreement containing the following:

(a) The terms of compensation, including:

(i) The amount the principal agrees to compensate the firm;

(ii) The principal's consent, if any, and any terms of such consent, to compensation sharing between firms and parties; and

(iii) The principal's consent, if any, and any terms of such consent, to compensation of the firm by more than one party;

(b) In a services agreement with a buyer, whether the appointed broker agrees to show the buyer properties if there is no agreement or offer by any party or firm to pay compensation to the firm; and

(c) Any other agreements between the parties.

(8) In lieu of obtaining a services agreement, a broker rendering real estate brokerage services to a buyer solely for commercial real estate may disclose in writing to the buyer, before the buyer signs an offer with regard to such commercial real estate, the sources and amounts of any compensation the broker has or expects to receive from any party in conjunction with such transaction. The disclosure shall be set forth in a separate paragraph titled "Compensation Disclosure" in the agreement between the buyer and seller or in a separate writing titled "Compensation Disclosure."

(9) A firm may receive compensation without a services agreement for the provision of a broker's price opinion, as defined in RCW 18.85.011, or a referral by one firm to another firm if the referring firm provided no real estate brokerage services in the transaction.

[ 2023 c 318 s 8; 2013 c 58 s 9; 1997 c 217 s 6; 1996 c 179 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 318: See note following RCW 18.86.010.

Real estate agency pamphlet—1997 c 217 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 18.86.120.

Effective date—1997 c 217 ss 1-6 and 8: See note following RCW 18.86.020.